Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
432C

NONPROFIT
ENTITIES; CONVERSION OF ASSETS]

Section

432C-1 Definitions

432C-2 Application for conversion

432C-3 Approval process

432C-4 Directors, officers of nonprofit entity;
prohibition

432C-5 Transfer of assets to other nonprofit
entities

432C-6 For-profit entity; after conversion

432C-7 Judicial review

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next